District of Columbia statutes.
29-607.05

Continued use of partnership name.

Continued use of a partnership name, or a dissociated partner’s name as part thereof, by partners continuing the partnership’s activities and affairs shall not of itself make the dissociated partner liable for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partners or the partnership continuing the activities and affairs.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(7)(C), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “partnership’s activities and affairs” for the first occurrence of “business”; substituted “a debt, obligation, or other liability” for “an obligation”; and substituted “activities and affairs” for the second occurrence of “business.”
2001 Ed., § 33-107.05.
1981 Ed., § 41-157.5.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 705 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).